Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-306
Cattle drover; trespassing; penalty; liability for damages.

If any owner or person in charge of any drove of cattle, horses or sheep shall willfully, carelessly or negligently injure any resident within the state by driving such drove from the public highways and herding the same on the lands occupied and improved by persons in possession of the same, he shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor, and shall be liable for such damages as may be done to the property.

Laws 1879, § 5, p. 69;

R.S.1913, § 100;

C.S.1922, § 108;

C.S.1929, § 54-305;

R.S.1943, § 54-306;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 18.